test/data/listyaml/V-list_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  

    cuggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuugâm
    cuskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuuskâm
    cuskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: coská
    cuvnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuuvnâm
    cuvnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: covná
    hutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huutkâm
    juksâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juuvsâm
    jurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jormá
    kukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuhâm
    kukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kokká
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgá
    kulnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulnâm
    kulnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolná
    kulŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulŋâm
    kulŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolŋá
    kupsâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuupsâm
    kurssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuursâm
    kurssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurssá
    kuvdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvdâm
    kuvdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovdá
    kuvzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvzâm
    kuškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuškâm
    kuškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: košká
    kužžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuužâm
    luškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuškâm
    luškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lošká
    čulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuulgâm
    čulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čolgá
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuurmâm
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čormá
    nukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuhâm
    nukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nokká
    nurdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuurdâm
    nurdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nordá
    nutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuđhâm
    nutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: notká
    purgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porgá
    puttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puutâm
    puttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pottá
    suddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suudâm
    sulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suulgâm
    sulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: solgá
    suttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suutâm
    suttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suttá
    skurbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuurbâm
    tubdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuubdâm
    tubdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tobdá
    tulkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuulhâm
    tulkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tolkká
    tulvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulvá
    turššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turššá
    tutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuuđhâm
    tutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: totká
    tuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuušâm
    tuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuššá
    utkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuđhâm
    uigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuigâm
    šuimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šuuimâm
    sturccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuurcâm
    sturccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sturccá
    ruggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruugâm
    ruggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roggá

    coggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coogâm
    foskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fooskâm
    joskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jooskâm
    jovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joovgâm
    jovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: javga
    hovrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrá
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalga
    kolppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolpâm
    kopšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kapša
    kordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koordâm
    kordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karda
    korkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorhâm
    korttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koortâm
    korttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kartta
    koskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kooskâm
    koskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaska
    kostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koostâm
    kostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuástá
    kozzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koozâm
    koškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kooškâm
    koškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaška
    koččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koočâm
    loggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loogâm
    loigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: looigâm
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: looskâm
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laska
    loskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: laskeh
    ložžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loožâm
    ložžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luážžá
    mostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moostâm
    mostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: masta
    njorttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoortâm
    njorttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njartta
    noigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nooigâm
    olkkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oolhâi
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oopâm 
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppá
    orvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oorvâm
    orvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arva
    ostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oostâm
    ostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: asta
    poggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poogâm
    poigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paiga
    polgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poolgâm
    polgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puálgá
    porgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poorgâm
    porgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: parga
    rokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roohâm
    roppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roopâm
    roppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rappa
    rovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovdâm
    rovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ravda
    rovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovâm
    rovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ravva
    sohtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahta
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooinâm
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saina
    stoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stooigâm
    sotkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soođhâm
    sotkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suátká
    sovđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savđa
    spolččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spoolčâm
    šloggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloogâm
    šloggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlagga
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoodâm
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: herhis
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kävilin
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šadda
    čolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolgâm
    čolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolmâm
    čolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalma
    čovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoovgâm
    čovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čavga
    vovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voovdâm
    vovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vavda
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tooimâm
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáimá
    toppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toopâm
    toppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tappa
    tovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovgâm
    tovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tavga
    tovkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovhâm
    tovkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuávkká
    storccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuárccá

    kaggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaagâm
    kaidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaaidâm
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaalgâm
    kalvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kálvá
    karbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarbâm
    karsâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarsâm
    karttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaartâm
    karttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kárttá
    kastâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaastâm
    kastâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kástá
    kavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavhâm
    kavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávkká
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavnâm
    kađvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaađvâm
    kaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaačâm
    kaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: káččá
    laddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láddá
    lahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavtâm
    lahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láhtá
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laaimâm
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láimá
    lavdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavdâm
    lavdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lávdá
    lavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laavâm
    lavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lávvá
    maccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maacâm
    maizâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maaizâm
    maldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máldá
    nalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naalgâm
    nalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nálgá
    njaskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaaskâm
    njavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavhâm
    paccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paacâm
    paddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paadâm
    paddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: páddá
    paimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paaimâm
    palgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paalgâm
    pallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paalâm
    pamppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paampâm
    pamppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pámppá
    raigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raaigâm
    ravkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raavhâm
    sargâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saargâm
    savjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sávjá
    skalvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skálvá
    skarbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skaarbâm
    skaŋkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáŋkká
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaibâm
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táibá
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaigâm
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táigá
    tabžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taabžâm
    tabžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tábžá
    tahtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taavtâm
    talvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tálvá
    tanccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taancâm
    tarjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taarjâm
    tarjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tárjá
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaaibâm
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váibá
    valgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaalgâm
    valgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: válgá
    vaskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váská
    vazzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaazâm
    čarŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaarŋâm
    čarŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čárŋá
    časkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaaskâm
    časkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáská

    cissâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciisâm
    hippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiipâm
    iskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iiskâm
    iskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iská
    ištâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iištâm
    likkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liihâm
    njipčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njipčá
    ristâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riistâm
    skirnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiirnâm
    tikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiihâm
    tikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tikká
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viigâm
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viggá
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vihká
    vipšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viipšâm
    čihtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiivtâm
    šipšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiipšâm
    čivgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čivgá

    elbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iälbá
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eeđâm
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iätá
    helbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heelbâm
    keččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keejâm
    lekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leehâm
    lekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liäkká
    njeđgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäđgá
    pekkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäkká
    servâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seervâm
    servâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärvá
    spellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: speelâm
    spellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiällá
    srevžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sreevžâm
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teeivâm
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäivá
    terppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teerpâm
    terppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiärppá
    tevŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiävŋá
    velttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veeltâm
    velttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälttá
    čergâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čeergâm
    čergâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiärgá
    telmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teelmâm
    telmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälmá
